Florida, session 2026, HB377.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 210.01, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
210.01 Definitions.—When used in this part the following
words shall have the meaning herein indicated:
(1) "Cigarette" means any roll for smoking, except one of
which the tobacco is fully naturally fermented, without regard
to the kind of tobacco or other substances used in the inner
roll or the nature or composition of the material in which the
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb377-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 377 2026
roll is wrapped, which is made wholly or in part of tobacco
irrespective of size or shape and whether such tobacco is
flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other ingredient. The
term does not include a heated tobacco product as defined by s.
210.25.
Section 2. Paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of section
210.095, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
210.095 Mail order, Internet, and remote sales of tobacco
products; age verification.—
(1) For purposes of this section, the term:
(i) "Tobacco products" means all cigarettes, smoking
tobacco, snuff, fine-cut chewing tobacco, cut and granulated
tobacco, cavendish, and plug or twist tobacco, and heated
tobacco products as defined in s. 210.25.
Section 3. Part II of chapter 210, Florida Statutes,
entitled "Tax on Tobacco Products other than Cigarettes or
Cigars," is renamed "Tax on Tobacco Products other than
Cigarettes, Heated Tobacco Products, or Cigars."
Section 4. Present subsections (6) through (14) of section
210.25, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (7)
through (15), respectively, a new subsection (6) is added to
that section, and present subsection (12) of that section is
amended, to read:
210.25 Definitions.—As used in this part:
(6) "Heated tobacco product" means a product containing
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb377-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 377 2026
tobacco designed for use in an electronic device with a heat
source that does not involve any form of burning or combustion
during ordinary conditions of use and which produces an
inhalable aerosol by heating the tobacco but does not produce
any smoke.
(13)(12) "Tobacco products" means loose tobacco suitable
for smoking; snuff; snuff flour; cavendish; plug and twist
tobacco; fine cuts and other chewing tobaccos; shorts; refuse
scraps; clippings, cuttings, and sweepings of tobacco, and other
kinds and forms of tobacco prepared in such manner as to be
suitable for chewing; but "tobacco products" does not include
cigarettes, as defined by s. 210.01(1), heated tobacco products,
or cigars.
Section 5. Subsection (8) of section 569.002, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
569.002 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
(8) "Tobacco products" includes loose tobacco leaves, and
products made from tobacco leaves, in whole or in part, and
cigarette wrappers, which can be used for smoking, sniffing, or
chewing, and heated tobacco products as defined in s. 210.25.
Section 6. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
951.22, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
951.22 County detention facilities; contraband articles.—
(1) It is unlawful, except through regular channels as
duly authorized by the sheriff or officer in charge, to
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb377-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 377 2026
introduce into or possess upon the grounds of any county
detention facility as defined in s. 951.23 or to give to or
receive from any inmate of any such facility wherever said
inmate is located at the time or to take or to attempt to take
or send therefrom any of the following articles, which are
contraband:
(d) Any tobacco products as defined in s. 210.25 s.
210.25(12).
Section 7. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
made by this act to section 569.002, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 569.31, Florida
Statutes, is reenacted to read:
569.31 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
(5) "Nicotine product" means any product that contains
nicotine, including liquid nicotine, which is intended for human
consumption, whether inhaled, chewed, absorbed, dissolved, or
ingested by any means. The term also includes any nicotine
dispensing device. The term does not include a:
(a) Tobacco product, as defined in s. 569.002;
(b) Product regulated as a drug or device by the United
States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the
Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or
(c) Product that contains incidental nicotine.
Section 8. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb377-00